Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 3A O.S. 2021, Section 602, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 602. A. As used in the Oklahoma State Athletic
Commission Act:

1. "Administrator" means the administrator of the Oklahoma
State Athletic Commission;
2. "Amateur combative sports event" means a combative sports
event in which the participants have never been licensed as
professionals in any combative sport;
3. "Amateur combative sports practitioner" means a person who
has never received or competed for any purse or other article either
for the expenses of training therefor or for participating in any
combative sports contest or exhibition which exceeds in monies or
other things of value a sum to be determined by the Oklahoma State
Athletic Commission;
4. "Amateur mixed martial artist" means a person eighteen (18)
years of age or older who has never received or competed for any
purse or other article either for the expenses of training therefor
or for participating in any combative sport contest or professional
exhibition which exceeds in monies or other things of value a sum to
be determined by the Oklahoma State Athletic Commission;
5. "Amateur mixed martial arts" means any form of competitive
pugilistic contest in which the participants have never been
licensed as professionals in any combative sport and blows are
delivered with any part of the hands, feet, or knees and multiple
combative disciplines are used including grappling. Such contests
take place in a rope-enclosed ring or fenced enclosed cage and are
fought in timed rounds;
6. "Applicant" means any person, individual, club, association,
corporation, partnership or trust which submits to the Oklahoma
State Athletic Commission an application for a license or permit
pursuant to the Oklahoma State Athletic Commission Act;
7. "Booking agent" means independent contractors who act as
bookers, agents, agencies and representatives who secure engagements
and contracts for combative sports participants;
8. "Boxing" means any form of competitive pugilism or unarmed
combat in which a blow is usually struck which may reasonably be
expected to inflict injury, including, but not limited to, boxing,
wrestling, mixed martial arts, and kickboxing, but shall not include
the martial arts as defined by the provisions of this section;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1122 Page 2

9. "Broadcast" means any audio or visual transmission sent by
any means of signal within this state, whether live or taped or time
delayed, and includes any replays thereof. "Broadcast" shall not
include any audio or visual transmission sent by any means of signal
of any professional boxing event conducted outside this state;
10. "Cable system operator" means any person who makes
available or provides customers a closed-circuit telecast which is
pay-per-view, including any person who does so as a direct broadcast
satellite provider or other multichannel video service provider;
11. "Closed-circuit telecast of professional combative sporting
events" means telecast rights, including television, cable
television, or pay-per-view telecasts, acquired by paying a
licensing fee or by paying a contractual price by a business or
individual, including, but not limited to, arenas, entertainment or
meeting centers, restaurants, bars, taverns, hotels, motels, clubs,
and organizations, which offers the viewing of the event to the
public or to private residences. Such events shall include local
and state professional combative sports contests and professional
exhibitions as defined in this section. "Closed-circuit telecast"
means any such telecast of a professional combative sporting event
as described herein which is not intended to be available for
viewing without the payment of a fee, collected for or based upon
each event viewed, for the privilege of viewing the telecast, and
includes pay-per-view;
12. "Club" means an incorporated or unincorporated association
or body of individuals voluntarily united and acting together for
some common or special purpose;
13. "Combative sports" means any form of competitive pugilism
or unarmed combat in which a blow is usually struck which may
reasonably be expected to inflict injury, including but not limited
to boxing, wrestling, mixed martial arts, and kickboxing, but shall
not include the martial arts (singular) as defined by the provisions
of this section;
14. "Combative sports practitioner" means a person who competes
or spars in a combative sports event and includes, including, but
not limited to, boxers, kickboxers, mixed martial artists and
wrestlers;
15. "Commission" means the Oklahoma State Athletic Commission;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1122 Page 3

16. "Contest" means a combative sports event in which it is
reasonable to anticipate that the participants strive earnestly in
good faith to win;
17. "Corner person" means, but shall not be limited to, a
trainer, a second, or any other individual who attends the
participant during a match;
18. "Event" means a combative sports contest or exhibition
including but not limited to a match, bout, contest, show or
tournament;
19. "Exhibition" means a combative sports event in which the
participants show or display their skill by sparring without
necessarily striving to win;
20. "Judge" means an individual other than a referee who shall
have a vote in determining the winner of any contest;
21. "Kickboxing" means any form of competitive pugilistic
professional or amateur contest or exhibition in which blows are
delivered with the hand and any part of the foot. Such contests or
exhibitions take place in a rope-enclosed ring and are fought in
timed rounds;
22. "License" means a certificate issued by the Commission to
participants of sanctioned professional or amateur combative sports
contests, professional or exhibitions, and amateur mixed martial
arts contests and is a mandatory requirement for participation in
such events;
23. "Manager" means an individual who controls or administers
the affairs of any professional combative sports participant,
including acting as a booking agent. "Manager" shall include the
representative of a manager as defined by the Commission;
24. "Martial arts" means any form of karate, kung fu, tae kwon-
do, or any other form of martial or self-defense art;
25. "Matchmaker" means an individual who brings together
professional combative sports participants or arranges professional
combative sports contests or professional exhibitions;
26. "Participant" means an individual who takes part in a
combative sports event;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1122 Page 4

27. "Pay-per-view telecasts of professional combative sports
events" means telecasts offered by cable television companies to
subscribers at a cost in addition to the monthly cable television
subscription rate. Such events shall include local and state
professional combative sports contests and professional exhibitions
as defined in this section;
28. "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, joint
venture, limited liability company, club, association, corporation,
trust, or other entity any other group or combination acting in
concert, or any assignee, agent, employee, director, officer, or any
other representative of such person;
29. "Physician" means an individual licensed under the laws of
this state to engage in the general practice of medicine or
osteopathic medicine;
30. "Professional combative sports practitioner" means an
individual eighteen (18) years of age or older who competes for
money, prizes, or purses, or who teaches, instructs, or assists in
the practice of combative sports or sparring as a means of obtaining
pecuniary gain;
31. "Professional combative sports event" means a combative
sports event in which the participants are paid a purse;
32. "Professional mixed martial arts" means any form of
competitive pugilistic contest in which the participants are paid a
purse and blows are delivered with any part of the hands, feet,
elbows, or knees and multiple combative disciplines are used to
include grappling. Such contests take place in a rope-enclosed ring
or fenced enclosed cage and are fought in timed rounds;
33. "Promote" or "promoting" means producing, staging,
sponsoring, organizing or otherwise holding a combative sports event
whether or not the event is open to the public;
34. "Promoter" means any person or individual, whether a
resident or nonresident of Oklahoma, or club or corporation, whether
domesticated or not domesticated in Oklahoma, that produces or
stages professional contests, amateur mixed martial arts contests,
or professional exhibitions conducted within this state and shall
include any officer, director, or employees as defined by the
Commission;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1122 Page 5

35. "Pugilism" means combative sports or the skill or practice
of fighting with the fists;
36. "Purse" means the financial guarantee or any other
remuneration or thing of value for which a combative sports
practitioner participates in a professional combative sports event
and shall include the participant's share of any payment received
for radio broadcasting, television, including cable television, pay-
per-view television, and closed-circuit television, and motion
picture rights. "Purse" shall also include gate receipts and any
other prizes;
37. "Ring official" means any individual who performs an
official function during the progress of a combative sports event or
amateur mixed martial arts event including but not limited to
timekeepers, judges, referees, and attending physicians;
38. "Sanctioning permit" means a permit issued by the
Commission to promoters who make application for official approval
of a professional or amateur combative sports events and amateur
mixed martial arts events event;
39. "Sparring" means to engage in a form of combative sport
with jabbing or feinting movements, and the exchange of few heavy
blows, such as occurs in a practice or exhibition boxing match;
40. "Telecast promoter" means any promoter who shows or causes
to be shown in this state a closed-circuit telecast of any
professional combative sports event conducted in this state.
"Telecast promoter" shall not include a cable system operator;
41. "Trainer" means an individual who assists, coaches, or
instructs any professional combative sports practitioner or amateur
mixed martial artist with respect to physical conditioning,
strategy, techniques, or preparation for competition, professional
combative sports contests, or professional exhibitions; and
42. "Vendor" means any individual, firm, organization, club, or
corporation that participates in the conduct of a professional
combative sports event or amateur mixed martial arts event conducted
in this state by offering for sale food or merchandise, including,
but not limited to, wearing apparel, alcoholic and nonalcoholic
beverages, souvenirs, and programs.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1122 Page 6

B. The Commission may define any term which is not defined in
the Oklahoma State Athletic Commission Act.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 3A O.S. 2021, Section 604.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 604.2. A. The mission of the Oklahoma State Athletic
Commission shall be to preserve and protect the health, safety and
welfare of combative sports event participants and the general
public through the effective regulation of combative sports in the
State of Oklahoma, while fostering an environment that expands
existing combative sports events and brings new events into the
state.
B. The Commission shall have the power and duty to:
1. Promulgate rules and issue orders necessary to carry out the
purposes of the Oklahoma State Athletic Commission Act, and enforce
the provisions of said act and the rules promulgated pursuant
thereto;
2. Assume jurisdiction over all matters relating to the
licensing of amateur and professional combative sports
practitioners, amateur including, but not limited to, mixed martial
artists, amateur kickboxers, professional boxers, corner persons,
booking agents, matchmakers, promoters, referees, judges,
timekeepers, vendors, physicians, announcers, clubs, and
corporations associated with a an amateur or professional combative
sports event, amateur including, but not limited to, a kickboxing
event or amateur, mixed martial arts event, or professional boxing
event related thereto;
3. Act to halt the unlicensed promotion of professional
combative sports events and seek administrative, criminal, and civil
penalties against those engaged in booking, matchmaking, and
promoting unsanctioned events;
4. Set license and permit fees pursuant to the requirements of
the Oklahoma State Athletic Commission Act;
4. 5. Conduct investigations into the qualifications of
applicants for licensure and registration;
5. 6. Conduct investigations and proceedings for alleged
violations of the Oklahoma State Athletic Commission Act and order
ENR. H. B. NO. 1122 Page 7

or subpoena the attendance of witnesses, the inspection of records
and premises, and the production of relevant books and papers
necessary to such investigations and proceedings;
6. 7. Develop and administer examinations for applicants for
licenses and permits; and
7. 8. Make such expenditures as may be necessary in the
performance of its duties.
C. Any rule promulgated, order made, or action taken prior to
July 1, 1999, by the Commissioner of Labor or the Department of
Labor pursuant to the provisions of, or rules issued pursuant to,
the Oklahoma State Athletic Commission Act shall be considered valid
and in effect unless amended, repealed, or rescinded by the
Commission.
D. Any valid license, permit, certificate, or registration
issued prior to July 1, 1999, by the Commissioner of Labor pursuant
to the Oklahoma State Athletic Commission Act, or rules promulgated
pursuant thereto, shall remain valid and in effect until it expires
pursuant to law or unless suspended or revoked by the Commission.
Any application for a license, permit, certificate, or registration
which is pending on June 30, 1999, is hereby transferred to the
Commission.
E. All personnel, powers, duties, responsibilities, fund
balances, encumbrances, obligations, and property, which shall
include records, furniture, and equipment of the Department of Labor
relating to the regulation of combative sports, are hereby
transferred to the Oklahoma State Athletic Commission.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 3A O.S. 2021, Section 605, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 605. A. The Oklahoma State Athletic Commission may
employ an administrator to oversee the organization and activities
of the Commission and to ensure compliance with rules promulgated by
the Commission. The administrator shall perform such other duties
as the Commission may prescribe. The salary of the administrator
shall be set by the Commission. The position of administrator shall
be an unclassified position.
B. The Commission may employ an assistant to keep records of
all proceedings relating to professional combative sports and
ENR. H. B. NO. 1122 Page 8

amateur mixed martial arts and to preserve all books, documents, and
papers belonging to the Commission. The assistant shall perform
such other duties as the Commission may prescribe. The Commission
may employ such other personnel as necessary, subject to statutory
full-time-equivalent (FTE) limits applicable to the State Department
of Health.
C. The State Department of Health shall provide administrative
support for the Commission, including, but not limited to, office
space, equipment, and furnishings, payroll and employee benefit
administration and processing, and travel and expense reimbursement,
and shall manage the Commission’s funds at the direction of the
Commission. The State Department of Health shall be entitled to
reimbursement for the actual cost of providing said administrative
support to the Commission from the Oklahoma State Athletic
Commission Revolving Fund; provided that said reimbursement shall
not exceed in any year ten percent (10%) of the total revenue
deposited in the fund in the preceding fiscal year received from
fees, administrative fines, reimbursements, bond proceeds and sale
of materials, but not including cash bonds held in trust by the
Commission. Upon a written directive of expenditure from Commission
funds signed by a majority of the Commission members or the
Commission administrator, the State Department of Health shall
process and make payment for said expenditure from Commission funds
within fifteen (15) business days of receipt of the written
directive from the State Department of Health. All other
Commission-directed expenditures shall be processed according to
State Department of Health policy.
D. Employees of the Commission shall be considered unclassified
employees of the State Department of Health only for the purpose of
administrative support provided by the State Department of Health as
prescribed in subsection C of this section.
C. Persons employed by the Commission shall serve at the
direction and pleasure of the Commission and shall answer directly
to the Commission administrator and the Commission.
E. D. The administrator, the assistant, and any other employees
of the Commission or any persons related to said employees within
the third degree by either consanguinity or affinity shall be
prohibited from promoting, sponsoring, or having any pecuniary
interest in any professional combative sports event or amateur mixed
martial arts event regulated by the Commission with the exception of
medical personnel.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1122 Page 9

E. Beginning on the effective date of this act, the Commission
shall cease all support from the State Department of Health and
shall be deemed to be a separate and distinct agency. All records,
property, equipment, assets, monies, financial interests,
liabilities, matters pending, and funds of the Commission shall be
transferred to the Commission.
F. The State Department of Health and the Commission may enter
into an agreement for the transfer of personnel from the State
Department of Health to the Commission. No employees of the
Commission shall be required to accept a lesser grade or salary than
presently received. All employees shall retain leave, sick and
annual time earned, and any retirement and longevity benefits which
have accrued during their tenure with the State Department of
Health. The transfer of personnel shall be coordinated with the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services.
G. The expenses incurred by the Commission as a result of the
transfer required by this section shall be paid by the Commission.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 3A O.S. 2021, Section 606, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 606. A. The Oklahoma State Athletic Commission is
hereby vested with jurisdiction to issue sanctioning permits for all
professional and amateur combative sports contests and exhibitions,
for all amateur including, but not limited to, mixed martial arts
contests and exhibitions and all amateur kickboxing contests and
exhibitions, professional boxing, and kickboxing held or given
within this state and to issue licenses for participants of
sanctioned contests and exhibitions.
B. 1. No person shall It shall be unlawful to promote, nor
shall any person or participate in, a professional or amateur
combative sports event or an amateur mixed martial arts event or an
amateur kickboxing event unless the event is sanctioned by the
Commission.
2. Except as provided in paragraphs 1 and 2 of subsection C of
this section, no person shall it shall be unlawful to promote an
amateur combative sports event unless the event has been is
sanctioned by the Commission.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1122 Page 10

3. Any person violating the provisions of this subsection shall
be punishable pursuant to the subject to the administrative and
criminal penalty provisions of Section 615 of this title.
C. Specifically exempt from the provisions of the Oklahoma
State Athletic Commission Act are the amateur combative sports
contests or exhibitions conducted or sponsored by:
1. Any school, college, or university where the participants
are students regularly enrolled in such institutions and the
instructors, coaches, and trainers are employees of such
institutions. The term "school, college, or university" shall not
include a school or other institution whose principal purpose is to
furnish instruction in combative sports or sparring;
2. Any military installation or branch of the Armed Forces
where the participants are employed by the military installation or
are members of the branch of the Armed Forces sponsoring the contest
or exhibition;
3. USA Boxing; and
4. The International Olympic Committee.
D. The following persons are specifically exempt from the
provisions of the Oklahoma State Athletic Commission Act:
1. Practitioners and instructors of the martial arts as defined
in Section 602 of this title; and
2. Instructors of amateur combative sports practitioners if
such instructors are not required to be licensed pursuant to other
provisions of the Oklahoma State Athletic Commission Act.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 3A O.S. 2021, Section 616, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 616. A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury
a revolving fund for the Oklahoma State Athletic Commission to be
designated the "Oklahoma State Athletic Commission Revolving Fund".
The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year
limitations, and shall consist of all monies received from fees,
administrative fines, reimbursements, bond proceeds, and sale of
materials, and shall include grants and gifts, pursuant to the
Oklahoma State Athletic Commission Act. All monies accruing to the
ENR. H. B. NO. 1122 Page 11

credit of said fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and
expended by the State Department of Health as directed by the
Commission for the purpose of implementing the provisions of the
Oklahoma State Athletic Commission Act. Expenditures from said fund
shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against
claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
B. The "Professional Boxing Licensing Revolving Fund" created
for the Department of Health is hereby abolished. On July 1, 2008,
any unencumbered funds remaining in the Professional Boxing
Licensing Revolving Fund shall be transferred to the credit of the
Oklahoma State Athletic Commission Revolving Fund. Any unexpended
funds remaining in the Professional Boxing Licensing Revolving Fund
after November 1, 2008, shall be transferred to the credit of the
Oklahoma State Athletic Commission Revolving Fund.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 3A O.S. 2021, Section 624, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 624. A. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
prior to being issued a license pursuant to this act every
participant applicant shall submit a certified copy of results from
testing performed by a laboratory certified pursuant to 42 C.F.R.
Part 493 verifying that the applicant is not infected with the human
immunodeficiency virus (HIV), the hepatitis B virus or the hepatitis
C virus. The testing shall be performed no more than Testing shall
be conducted within three hundred sixty-five (365) days before the
application is submitted. A statement from a doctor of osteopathy
or medical doctor indicating that the applicant has successfully
completed a full course of vaccinations for hepatitis B may be
submitted in lieu of the results of testing for hepatitis B before
the combative sports contest or exhibition the participant applicant
is participating in. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
an applicant who receives positive results from any of the tests
required by this section shall be denied a license for the
particular contest.
B. If a participant must be replaced within twenty-four (24)
hours of an event, a promoter may replace the participant that has
been pulled with a new participant that has complied with the
testing requirements found in subsection A of this section.
C. Notwithstanding the requirement for testing stated in
subsection A of this section, the participant and opponent, ring
ENR. H. B. NO. 1122 Page 12

official, and ringside physician may agree, in writing, to waive the
denial of licensure for failure to timely submit the required
certified test results, and by such signed written agreement, the
participant and opponent shall be granted a license to participate
in their particular contest.
SECTION 7. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1122 Page 13

Passed the House of Representatives the 18th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1122 Page 14

ENR. H. B. NO. 1122 Page 15